fr: Fonctionnalités supplémentaires du logiciel de gestion financière: Gestion d’actifs; Audit et conformité; Gestion de la facturation; Tenue des comptes et comptabilité; Budgétisation et prévisions; Analyse financière; Normes PCGR; Normes IFRS; Gestion de la paie; Rapports réglementaires; Conformité fiscale; Autre
th: คุณลักษณะเพิ่มเติมของซอฟต์แวร์ทางการเงิน: การจัดการสินทรัพย์; การตรวจสอบและการปฏิบัติตามกฎระเบียบ; การจัดการการเรียกเก็บเงิน; การจัดทำบัญชีและการบัญชี; การจัดทำงบประมาณและการคาดการณ์; การวิเคราะห์ทางการเงิน; มาตรฐาน GAAP; มาตรฐาน IFRS; การจัดการบัญชีเงินเดือน; การรายงานตามกฎระเบียบ; การปฏิบัติตามกฎระเบียบด้านภาษี; อื่นๆ
da: Yderligere funktioner for finansiel software: Aktivadministration; Revision og compliance; Faktureringsstyring; Bogføring og regnskabsføring; Budgettering og prognose; Finansiel analyse; GAAP standarder; IFRS-standarder; Lønstyring; Regulatorisk rapportering; Overholdelse af skatteregler; Andet
hr-HR: Dodatne značajke financijskog softvera: Upravljanje imovinom; Revizija i usklađenost; Upravljanje fakturiranjem; Knjigovodstvo i računovodstvo; Budžetiranje i predviđanje; Financijska analiza; Standardi GAAP; Standardi IFRS; Upravljanje plaćama; Regulatorno izvješćivanje; Porezna usklađenost; Ostalo
es: Características adicionales del software de finanzas: Gestión de activos; Auditoría y cumplimiento; Gestión de facturación; Contabilidad; Presupuestos y previsiones; Análisis financiero; Estándares GAAP; Estándares NIIF; Gestión de nóminas; Informes de normativas; Cumplimiento de las obligaciones fiscales; Otros
nl: Extra functies voor financiële software: Vermogensbeheer; Controle en naleving; Facturatiebeheer; Boekhouding en accounting; Budgetteren en voorspellen; Financiële analyse; GAAP-normen; IFRS-standaarden; Salarisbeheer; Regelgevende rapportage; Belastingnaleving; Andere
fi: Talousohjelmiston lisäominaisuudet: Varainhallinta; Tilintarkastus ja määräysten noudattaminen; Laskutuksen hallinta; Kirjanpito; Budjetointi ja ennusteet; Talousanalyysi; GAAP-standardit; IFRS-standardit; Palkkahallinto; Sääntelyraportointi; Verosäännösten noudattaminen; Muu
sk-SK: Ďalšie funkcie finančného softvéru: Správa majetku; Audit a dodržiavanie predpisov; Správa fakturácie; Vedenie účtovníctva a účtovníctvo; Rozpočtovanie a prognózovanie; Finančná analýza; Štandardy GAAP; Štandardy IFRS; Správa miezd; Regulačné výkazníctvo; Dodržiavanie daňových predpisov; Iné
ro-RO: Funcții suplimentare software financiar: Gestionarea activelor; Audit și conformitate; Gestionarea facturării; Evidență contabilă și contabilitate; Planificare bugetară și prognoză; Analiză financiară; Standardele GAAP; Standardele IFRS; Gestionarea salariilor; Raportarea în scopuri de reglementare; Conformitatea fiscală; Altele
de: Zusätzliche Funktionen der Finanzsoftware: Asset-Management; Auditierung und Compliance; Rechnungsverwaltung; Buchhaltung und Rechnungswesen; Budgetierung und Prognose; Finanzanalyse; GAAP-Standards; IFRS-Standards; Lohnabrechnungsmanagement; Meldewesen; Einhaltung der Steuervorschriften; Sonstiges
el: Πρόσθετες δυνατότητες χρηματοοικονομικού λογισμικού: Διαχείριση περιουσιακών στοιχείων; Έλεγχος και συμμόρφωση; Διαχείριση τιμολόγησης; Τήρηση βιβλίων και λογιστική; Προϋπολογισμοί και προβλέψεις; Χρηματοοικονομική ανάλυση; Πρότυπα GAAP; Διεθνή Λογιστικά Πρότυπα; Διαχείριση μισθοδοσίας; Υποβολή κανονιστικών εκθέσεων; Φορολογική συμμόρφωση; Άλλο
zh-CN: 其他财务软件功能: 资产管理; 审计与合规; 账单管理; 簿记与会计; 预算与预测; 财务分析; 公认会计原则 (GAAP); 国际财务报告准则 (IFRS); 薪资管理; 监管报告; 税务合规; 其他
pl: Dodatkowe funkcje oprogramowania finansowego: Zarządzanie aktywami; Audyt i zgodność; Zarządzanie rozliczeniami; Księgowość i rachunkowość; Budżetowanie i prognozowanie; Analiza finansowa; Standardy GAAP; Standardy MSSF; Zarządzanie płacami; Raportowanie regulacyjne; Zgodność z przepisami podatkowymi; Inne
lt-LT: Papildomos finansų programinės įrangos funkcijos: Turto valdymas; Auditas ir atitiktis; Sąskaitų valdymas; Buhalterija ir apskaita; Biudžeto sudarymas ir prognozės; Finansinė analizė; GAAP standartai; GAAP standartai; Darbo užmokesčio valdymas; Reguliavimo ataskaitų teikimas; Mokestinių prievolių vykdymas; Kita
tr: Ek finansal yazılım özellikleri: Varlık Yönetimi; Denetim ve uyumluluk; Fatura yönetimi; Defter tutma ve muhasebe; Bütçeleme ve tahminleme; Finansal analiz; GAAP standartları; IFRS standartları; Maaş bordrosu yönetimi; Düzenleyici raporlama; Vergi uyumluluğu; Diğer
ja: その他の金融ソフトウェア機能: アセット管理; 監査およびコンプライアンス; 請求管理; 簿記および会計; 予算編成および業績予測; 財務分析; GAAP基準; IFRS基準; 給与管理; 規制レポート; 税務コンプライアンス; その他
sv: Ytterligare detaljer för programvara för ekonomi: Tillgångshantering; Revision och efterlevnad; Faktureringshantering; Bokföring och redovisning; Budgetering och prognoser; Finansiell analys; GAAP-standarder; IFRS-standarder; Lönehantering; Lagstadgad rapportering; Skatteefterlevnad; Övrigt
sl-SI: Dodatne funkcije programske opreme za finance: Upravljanje premoženja; Revizija in skladnost; Upravljanje obračunavanja; Knjigovodstvo in računovodstvo; Načrtovanje in napovedovanje; Finančna analiza; Standardi GAAP; Standardi IFRS; Upravljanje plač; Regulativno poročanje; Izpolnjevanje davčnih obveznosti; Drugo
pt-PT: Características adicionais de software financeiro: Gestão de recursos; Auditoria e conformidade; Gestão de faturação; Escrituração contabilística; Orçamento e previsão; Análise financeira; Normas GAAP; Normas IFRS; Gestão de folha de pagamentos; Relatórios regulamentares; Conformidade fiscal; Outro
en: Additional financial software features: Asset management; Auditing and compliance; Billing management; Bookkeeping and accounting; Budgeting and forecasting; Financial analysis; GAAP standards; IFRS standards; Payroll management; Regulatory reporting; Tax compliance; Other
ru: Дополнительные функции финансового программного обеспечения: Управление активами; Аудит и соответствие требованиям; Управление биллингом; Бухгалтерский учет и отчетность; Бюджетирование и прогнозирование; Финансовый анализ; Стандарты GAAP; Стандарты МСФО; Расчеты с персоналом; Регуляторная отчетность; Обеспечение выполнения налоговых правил; Другое
it: Funzionalità aggiuntive del software finanziario: Gestione delle risorse; Audit e conformità; Gestione della fatturazione; Rendicontazione e contabilità; Budget e previsioni; Analisi finanziaria; Standard GAAP; Standard IFRS; Gestione delle buste paga; Segnalazione normativa; Adempimenti fiscali; Altro
hu: Pénzügyi szoftver további funkciói: Eszközkezelés; Auditálás és megfelelés; Számlázáskezelés; Könyvelés és számvitel; Költségvetés és előrejelzés; Pénzügyi elemzés; GAAP szabványok; IFRS szabványok; Bérszámfejtés; Jogszabályban előírt adatszolgáltatás; Adójogszabályoknak való megfelelés; Egyéb
pt-BR: Recursos adicionais de software financeiro: Gestão de ativos; Auditoria e conformidade; Gerenciamento de faturamento; Escrituração e contabilidade; Orçamento e previsão; Analise financeira; Padrões GAAP; Padrões IFRS; Gestão de folha de pagamento; Relatórios regulatórios; Conformidade tributária; Outro
nb: Tilleggsfunksjoner for økonomiprogramvare: Ressursstyring; Revisjon og samsvar; Faktureringshåndtering; Bokføring og regnskap; Budsjettering og prognoser; Økonomisk analyse; GAAP-standarder; IFRS-standarder; Lønnshåndtering; Regulatorisk rapportering; Skatteoverholdelse; Annet
vi: Các tính năng phần mềm tài chính bổ sung: Quản lý tài sản; Kiểm toán và tuân thủ; Quản lý thanh toán; Ghi sổ và kế toán; Lập ngân sách và dự báo; Phân tích tài chính; tiêu chuẩn GAAP; tiêu chuẩn IFRS; Quản lý tiền lương; Báo cáo theo quy định; Tuân thủ thuế; Khác
zh-TW: 附加會計軟體功能: 資產管理; 稽核與法規遵循; 計費管理; 簿記和會計; 預算和預測; 財務分析; 一般公認會計原則標準; 國際財務報導準則; 薪資管理; 監管報告; 稅務法規遵循; 其他
cs: Další vlastnosti finančního softwaru: Správa majetku; Audit a dodržování předpisů; Správa fakturace; Účetnictví; Rozpočtování a prognózování; Finanční analýza; standardy GAAP; standardy IFRS; Vedení mzdové agendy; Regulační výkaznictví; Dodržení daňové povinnosti; Jiné
bg-BG: Допълнителни функции на софтуера за финанси: Управление на активи; Одит и съответствие; Управление на таксуването; Счетоводство; Бюджетиране и прогнозиране; Финансов анализ; GAAP стандарти; IFRS стандарти; Управление на заплатите; Регулаторно отчитане; Спазване на данъчното законодателство; Други
ko: 추가 재무 소프트웨어 기능: 자산 관리; 감사 및 규정 준수; 결제 관리; 장부 작성 및 회계; 예산 책정 및 예측; 재무 분석; GAAP 표준; IFRS 표준; 급여 관리; 규제 보고; 납세 준수; 기타